sk-SK: Materiál spojovacích prvkov: Akryl; Hliník; Bambus; Kosť; Mosadz; Plátno; Meď; Korok; Bavlna; Denim; Tkanina; Umelá koža; Plsť; Sklo; Konope; Juta; Latex; Koža; Ľan; Lycra; Sieťovina; Kov; Neoprén; Nikel; Nylon; Cín; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polypropylén (PP); Ratan; Živica; Guma; Satén; Mušle; Silikón; Hodváb; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Semiš; Syntetický; Velúr; Zamat; Vinyl; Drevo; Vlna; Zinok; Iné
nl: Materiaal bevestiging: Acryl; Aluminium; Bamboe; Been; Messing; Canvas; Koper; Kurk; Katoen; Denim; Stof; Kunstleer; Vilt; Glas; Hennep; Jute; Latex; Leer; Linnen; Lycra; Gaas; Metaal; Neopreen; Nikkel; Nylon; Pewter; Plastic; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polypropyleen (PP); Rotan; Hars; Rubber; Satijn; Zeeschelp; Siliconen; Zijde; Roestvrij staal; Suède; Synthetisch; Velours; Fluweel; Vinyl; Hout; Wol; Zink; Andere
hu: Rögzítőelem anyaga: Akril; Alumínium; Bambusz; Csont; Sárgaréz; Vászon; Réz; Parafa; Pamut; Farmer; Szövet; Műbőr; Filc; Üveg; Kender; Juta; Latex; Bőr; Lenvászon; Lycra; Háló; Fém; Neoprén; Nikkel; Nejlon; Ónötvözet; Műanyag; Poliamid (PA); Poliészter; Polipropilén (PP); Rattan; Gyanta; Gumi; Szatén; Kagyló; Szilikon; Selyem; Rozsdamentes acél; Szarvasbőr; Szintetikus; Velúr; Bársony; Vinil; Fa; Gyapjú; Cink; Egyéb
sl-SI: Material pritrdilnega elementa: Akril; Aluminij; Bambus; Kost; Medenina; Platno; Baker; Pluta; Bombaž; Džins; Tkanina; Umetno usnje; Filc; Steklen; Konoplja; Juta; Latex; Usnje; Lan; Lycra; Mreža; Kovina; Neopren; Nikelj; Najlon; Kositer; Plastika; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Ratan; Smola; Guma; Saten; Školjka; Silikon; Svila; Nerjavno jeklo; Semiš; Sintetika; Velur; Žamet; Vinil; Les; Volna; Cink; Drugo
pt-PT: Material de fixação: Acrílico; Alumínio; Bambu; Osso; Latão; Tela; Cobre; Cortiça; Algodão; Ganga; Tecido; Couro falso; Feltro; Vidro; Cânhamo; Juta; Látex; Pele; Linho; Licra; Rede; Metal; Neoprene; Níquel; Náilon; Estanho; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Ratim; Resina; Borracha; Acetinado; Concha marinha; Silicone; Seda; Aço inoxidável; Camurça; Sintético; Aveludado; Veludo; Vinil; Madeira; Lã; Zinco; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal zatvarača: Akril; Aluminij; Bambus; Kost; Mjed; Platno; Bakar; Pluto; Pamuk; Traper; Tkanina; Umjetna koža; Filc; Staklo; Konoplja; Juta; Lateks; Koža; Lan; Likra; Mrežica; Metal; Neopren; Nikal; Najlon; Kositar; Plastika; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Ratan; Smola; Guma; Saten; Sedef; Silikon; Svila; Nehrđajući čelik; Antilop; Sintetika; Velur; Baršun; Vinil; Drvo; Vuna; Cink; Ostalo
es: Material de sujeción: Acrílico; Aluminio; Bambú; Hueso; Latón; Lienzo; Cobre; Corcho; Algodón; Vaquera; Tejido; Cuero sintético; Fieltro; Vidrio; Cáñamo; Yute; Látex; Cuero; Lino; Licra; Malla; Metal; Neopreno; Níquel; Nylon; Estaño; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Ratán; Resina; Goma; Satinado; Concha marina; Silicona; Seda; Acero inoxidable; Gamuzado; Sintético; Terciopelo; Terciopelo; Vinilo; Madera; Lana; Zinc; Otros
tr: Bağlantı elemanı malzemesi: Akrilik; Alüminyum; Bambu; Kemik; Pirinç; Tuval; Bakır; Mantar; Pamuk; Kot; Kumaşlar; Suni deri; Keçe; Cam; Kenevir; Jüt; Lateks; Deri; Keten; Likra; Ağ; Metal; Neopren; Nikel; Plastik; Kalaylı; Plastik; Poliamid (PA); Poliyester; Polipropilen (PP); Hint kamışı; Reçine; Kauçuk; Saten; Deniz kabuğu; Silikon; İpek; Paslanmaz çelik; Süet; Sentetik; Velur; Kadife; Vinil; Ahşap; Yünlüler; Çinko; Diğer
da: Fastgørelsesmateriale: Akryl; Aluminum; Bambus; Knogle; Messing; Lærred; Kobber; Kork; Bomuld; Denim; Stof; Kunstigt læder; Filt; Glas; Hamp; Jute; Latex; Læder; Linned; Lycra; Mesh; Metal; Neopren; Nikkel; Nylon; Tin; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Rattan; Harpiks; Gummi; Satin; Muslingeskal; Silikone; Silke; Rustfrit stål; Ruskind; Syntetisk; Velour; Fløjl; Vinyl; Træ; Uld; Zink; Andet
ro-RO: Material dispozitiv de fixare: Acrilic; Aluminiu; Bambus; Os; Alamă; Pânză; Cupru; Plută; Bumbac; Denim; Textile; Imitație de piele; Pâslă; Sticlă; Cânepă; Iută; Latex; Piele; In; Lycra; Plasă; Metal; Neopren; Nichel; Nailon; Aliaj alb; Plastic; Poliamidă (PA); Poliester; Polipropilenă (PP); Ratan; Rășină; Cauciuc; Satin; Scoică; Silicon; Mătase; Oțel inoxidabil; Piele întoarsă; Sintetic; Velour; Catifea; Vinil; Lemn; Lână; Zinc; Altele
sv: Fästelement - material: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambu; Ben; Mässing; Kanvas; Koppar; Kork; Bomull; Denim; Tyg; Fuskläder; Filt; Glas; Hampa; Jute; Latex; Läder; Linne; Lykra; Mesh; Metall; Neopren; Nickel; Nylon; Tenn; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polypropen (PP); Rattan; Harts; Gummi; Satin; Snäckskal; Silikon; Silke; Rostfritt stål; Mocka; Syntetisk; Velour; Sammet; Vinyl; Trä; Ylle; Zink; Annat
cs: Materiál utahováku: Akrylové; Hliník; Bambus; Kost; Mosaz; Plátno; Měděná; Korek; Bavlna; Džínovina; Látky; Nepravá kůže; Plst; Sklo; Konopí; Juta; Latex; Kůže; Len; Lycra; Síťovina; Kov; Neoprén; Nikl; Nylon; Cín; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Ratan; Pryskyřice; Guma; Satén; Mořské mušle; Silikon; Hedvábí; Nerezová ocel; Semiš; Syntetické; Velur; Samet; Vinylové; Dřevo; Vlna; Zinek; Jiné
zh-CN: 紧固件材质: 丙烯酸; 铝; 竹子; 骨头; 黄铜; 画布; 铜色; 软木; 棉布; 牛仔布; 面料/布料; 人造皮革; 毛毡; 玻璃; 麻; 黄麻; 乳胶; 皮革; 亚麻; 莱卡; 网状; 金属; 氯丁橡胶; 镍; 尼龙; 锡蜡; 塑料; 聚酰胺 (PA); 聚酯纤维; 聚丙烯 (PP); 藤条; 树脂; 橡胶; 缎; 贝壳; 硅胶; 丝绸; 不锈钢; 小牛皮; 合成; 丝绒; 天鹅绒; 乙烯基贴纸; 木头; 羊毛; 锌; 其他
fi: Kiinnitysmateriaali: Akryyli; Alumiini; Bambu; Luu; Messinki; Kanvaasi; Kupari; Korkki; Puuvilla; Denim; Kangas; Keinonahka; Huopa; Lasi; Hamppu; Juutti; Lateksi; Nahka; Pellava; Lycra; Verkko; Metalli; Neopreeni; Nikkeli; Nailon; Tina; Muovi; Polyamidi (PA); Polyesteri; Polypropeeni (PP); Rottinki; Hartsi; Kumi; Satiini; Kotilo; Silikoni; Silkki; Ruostumaton teräs; Mokka; Synteettinen; Velour; Sametti; Vinyyli; Puu; Villa; Sinkki; Muu
it: Materiale di fissaggio: Acrilico; Alluminio; Bamboo; Osso; Ottone; Tela; Rame; Sughero; Cotone; Denim; Tessuto; Ecopelle; Feltro; Vetro; Canapa; Iuta; Lattice; Pelle; Lino; Lycra; Mesh; Metallo; Neoprene; Nickel; Nylon; Peltro; Plastica; Poliammide (PA); Poliestere; Polipropilene (PP); Rattan; Resina; Gomma; Satinato; Conchiglia marina; Silicone; Seta; Acciaio inossidabile; Pelle scamosciata; Sintetico; Velour; Velluto; Vinile; Legno; Lana; Zinco; Altro
en: Fastener material: Acrylic; Aluminum; Bamboo; Bone; Brass; Canvas; Copper; Cork; Cotton; Denim; Fabric; Faux leather; Felt; Glass; Hemp; Jute; Latex; Leather; Linen; Lycra; Mesh; Metal; Neoprene; Nickel; Nylon; Pewter; Plastic; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Rattan; Resin; Rubber; Satin; Seashell; Silicone; Silk; Stainless steel; Suede; Synthetic; Velour; Velvet; Vinyl; Wood; Wool; Zinc; Other
zh-TW: 緊固件材質: 壓克力; 鋁; 竹子; 骨製; 黃銅; 帆布; 紅銅色; 軟木; 棉布; 牛仔布; 布料; 人造皮; 毛氈; 玻璃; 大麻; 黃麻; 乳膠; 皮製; 亞麻; 萊卡; 網布; 金屬; 氯丁橡膠; 鎳; 尼龍; 錫合金; 塑膠; 聚醯胺 (PA); 聚酯; 聚丙烯 (PP); 藤; 樹脂; 橡膠; 緞面布; 貝殼; 矽膠; 絲綢; 不銹鋼; 麂皮; 合成; 絲絨; 天鵝絨; 乙烯基; 木材; 羊毛; 鋅; 其他
el: Υλικό κλειδώματος: Ακρυλικό; Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Οστό; Ορείχαλκος; Καμβάς; Χαλκός; Φελλός; Βαμβάκι; Ντένιμ; Ύφασμα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Τσόχα; Γυαλί; Καννάβι; Γιούτα; Λάτεξ; Δέρμα; Λινό; Λύκρα; Πλέγμα; Μέταλλο; Νεοπρένιο; Νικέλιο; Νάιλον; Κασσίτερος; Πλαστικό; Πολυαμίδιο (PA); Πολυεστέρας; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Ρατάν; Ρητίνη; Καουτσούκ; Σατέν; Κοχύλι; Σιλικόνη; Μετάξι; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Καστόρι; Συνθετικό; Βελουτέ; Βελούδο; Βινύλιο; Ξύλο; Μαλλί; Τσίγκος; Άλλο
nb: Festemateriale: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Bein; Messing; Lerret; Kobber; Kork; Bomull; Denim; Stoff; Kunstig lær; Filt; Glass; Hamp; Jute; Lateks; Skinn; Lin; Lycra; Mesh; Metall; Neopren; Nikkel; Nylon; Tinn; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Rotting; Harpiks; Gummi; Sateng; Skjell; Silikon; Silke; Rustfritt stål; Semsket; Syntetisk; Velour; Fløyel; Vinyl; Trevirke; Ull; Sink; Annen
ru: Материал фиксирующего изделия: Акрил; Алюминий; Бамбук; Кость; Латунь; Холщовая ткань; Медь; Пробка; Хлопок; Деним; Ткань; Искусственная кожа; Фетр; Стеклянные; Конопля; Джут; Латекс; Кожа; Лен; Лайкра; Сетка; Металл; Неопрен; Никель; Нейлон; Олово; Пластик; Полиамид (ПА); Полиэстер; Полипропилен (ПП); Ротанг; Смола; Резина; Сатин; Ракушка; Силикон; Шелк; Нержавеющая сталь; Замша; Синтетика; Велюр; Бархат; Винил; Дерево; Шерсть; Цинк; Другой
de: Fixiermaterial: Acryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Knochen; Messing; Leinwand; Kupfer; Kork; Baumwolle; Denim; Stoff; Kunstleder; Filz; Glas; Hanf; Jute; Latex; Leder; Leinen; Lycra; Netz; Metall; Neopren; Nickel; Nylon; Zinn; Kunststoff; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Rattan; Harz; Gummi; Seidenmatt; Muschel; Silikon; Seide; Edelstahl; Wildleder; Synthetisch; Velours; Samt; Vinyl; Holz; Wolle; Zink; Sonstiges
ja: ファスナー材料: アクリル; アルミニウム; バンブー; ボーン; 真鍮; キャンバス; コッパー; コルク; コットン; デニム; 布・生地; フェイクレザー; フェルト; ガラス; 麻; ジュート; ラテックス; レザー; リネン; Lycra; メッシュ; 金属; ネオプレン; ニッケル; ナイロン; ピューター; プラスチック; ポリアミド (PA); ポリエステル; ポリプロピレン (PP); 籐; レジン; ゴム; サテン; 貝殻; シリコーン; シルク; ステンレススチール; スエード; 合成品; ベロア; ベルベット; ビニール; 木材; ウール; 亜鉛; その他
pl: Materiał zapięcia: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Kość; Mosiądz; Płótno; Miedź; Korek; Bawełna; Drelich; Tkanina; Skaj; Filc; Szkło; Konopie; Juta; Lateks; Skórzane; Bielizna pościelowa; Lycra; Siatka; Metal; Neopren; Nikiel; Nylon; Cyna; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Polipropylen (PP); Rattan; Żywica; Guma; Satyna; Muszla; Silikon; Jedwab; Stal nierdzewna; Zamsz; Syntetyczne; Welur; Aksamit; Winyl; Drewno; Wełna; Cynk; Pozostałe
bg-BG: Материал на закопчалката: Акрил; Алуминий; Бамбук; Кост; Месинг; Брезент; Мед; Корк; Памук; Деним; Плат; Изкуствена кожа; Филц; Стъкло; Коноп; Юта; Латекс; Кожа; Лен; Ликра; Мрежа; Метал; Неопрен; Никел; Найлон; Калай; Пластмаса; Полиамид (PA); Полиестер; Полипропилен (PP); Ратан; Смола; Каучук; Сатен; Морска мида; Силикон; Коприна; Неръждаема стомана; Набук; Синтетичен; Велур; Кадифе; Винил; Дърво; Вълна; Цинк; Други
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำตัวยึด: อะคริลิก; อะลูมิเนียม; ไผ่; กระดูก; ทองเหลือง; ผ้าใบ; สีทองแดง; ต้นคอร์ก; สำลี; ผ้าเดนิม; ผ้า; หนังเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; แก้ว; กัญชง; ใยปอ; ยางพารา; หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; ผ้าไลครา; ตาข่าย; โลหะ; นีโอพรีน; นิกเกิล; ไนลอน; โลหะผสมดีบุก; พลาสติก; โพลิอะไมด์ (PA); โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); หวาย; เรซิน; ยาง; กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; เปลือกหอย; ซิลิโคน; ผ้าไหม; เหล็กสเตนเลส; หนังกลับ; สังเคราะห์; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; ไวนิล; ไม้; ผ้าขนสัตว์; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
ko: 패스너 소재: 아크릴; 알루미늄; 대나무; 뼈; 황동; 캔버스; 구리; 코르크; 면; 데님; 패브릭; 인조 가죽; 펠트; 유리; 대마; 주트; 라텍스; 가죽; 린넨; 라이크라; 메쉬; 금속; 네오프렌; 니켈; 나일론; 땜납; 플라스틱; 폴리아미드(PA); 폴리에스테르; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 등나무; 수지; 고무; 새틴; 조개; 실리콘; 실크; 스테인리스 스틸; 스웨이드; 인조; 벨루어; 벨벳; 비닐; 목재; 울; 아연; 기타
fr: Matériau de l’attache: Acrylique; Aluminum; Bambou; Os; Laiton; Toiles; Cuivre; Liège; Coton; Jean; Tissu; Faux cuir; Feutre; Verre; Chanvre; Jute; Latex; Cuir; Lin; Lycra; A mailles; Métal; Néoprène; Nickel; Nylon; Étain; Plastique; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polypropylène (PP); Rattan; Résine; Caoutchouc; Satiné; Coquillage; Silicone; Soie; Acier inoxydable; Suède; Synthétique; Velours; Velours; Vinyl; Bois; Laine; Zinc; Autre
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo elemento medžiaga: Akrilas; Aliuminis; Bambukas; Kaulas; Žalvaris; Drobė; Varis; Kamštiena; Medvilnė; Džinsinis audinys; Audiniai; Dirbtinė oda; Veltinis; Stiklas; Kanapių pluoštas; Džiutas; Lateksas; Oda; Lininis audinys; Laikra; Tinklelis; Metalas; Neoprenas; Nikelis; Nailonas; Alavas; Plastikas; Poliamidas (PA); Poliesteris; Polipropilenas (PP); Ratanas; Derva; Kaučiukas; Satinas; Kiaukutas; Silikonas; Šilkas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Zomša; Sintetika; Veliūras; Aksomas; Vinilas; Mediena; Vilna; Cinkas; Kita
vi: Vật liệu chốt: Acrylic; Nhôm; Tre; Xương; Đồng; Toan; Màu đồng đỏ; Thảm gỗ bần; Vải bông; Bò; Vải; Da giả; Nỉ; Thủy tinh; Cây gai dầu; Sợi đay; Mủ cao su; Da; Lanh; Lycra; Lưới; Kim loại; Neoprene; Niken; Nylon; Hợp kim thiếc; Nhựa; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Cây mây; Nhựa resin; Cao su; Satin; Vỏ sò; Silicon; Lụa; Thép không gỉ; Da lộn; Tổng hợp; Vải velour; Nhung; Nhựa vinyl; Gỗ; Len; Kẽm; Khác
pt-BR: Material de fixação: Acrílico; Alumínio; Bambu; Osso; Latão; Tela; Cobre; Cortiça; Algodão; Jeans; Tecido; Couro falso; Sentido; Vidro; Cânhamo; Juta; Látex; Couro; Linho; Lycra; Malha; Metal; Neoprene; Níquel; Nylon; Estanho; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Rattan; Resina; Borracha; Cetim; Concha do mar; Silicone; Seda; Aço inoxidável; Camurça; Sintético; Veludo; Veludo; Vinil; Madeira; Lã; Zinco; Outro